North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 31. Miscellaneous.

§ 120-270.
Report by State agencies to the General Assembly on ways to reduce incidence of identity theft.

Agencies of the State shall evaluate the agency’s efforts to reduce the dissemination of personal identifying information, as defined in G.S. 14-113.20(b). The evaluation shall include the review of public forms, the use of random personal identification numbers, restriction of access to personal identifying information, and reduction of use of personal identifying information when it is not necessary. Special attention shall be given to the use, collection, and dissemination of social security numbers. If the collection of a social security number is found to be unwarranted, the State agency shall immediately discontinue the collection of social security numbers for that purpose. Any agency that determines that an act of the General Assembly or other provision of law impedes the agency’s ability to reduce the incidence of identity theft shall report such findings to the General Assembly by January 1 of the year following such a determination.

History.

2005-414, s. 5; 2012-187, s. 10.2.

§ 120-271.
Use of likenesses of any seal or coat of arms of the Senate.

Whoever, except as directed by the Senate or the Principal Clerk of the Senate on its behalf, knowingly uses, manufactures, reproduces, sells, or purchases for resale, either separately or appended to any article manufactured or sold, any likeness of any seal or coat of arms of the Senate, or any substantial part thereof, except for manufacture or sale of the article for the official use of the State of North Carolina, shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

A violation of this section may be enjoined at the suit of the Attorney General.

History.

2007-354, s. 1.

§§ 120-272 through 120-274.

Reserved for future codification purposes.